Louisiana, session 2026, SB139.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 13:5112(C) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§5112. Suits against the state or political subdivision; court costs; interest
* * *
C.(1) Legal interest on any claim for personal injury or wrongful death shall
accrue at the lesser of six percent per annum or the rate of judicial interest in
accordance with R.S. 13:4202. Legal interest shall accrue from the date service
is requested following judicial demand until the judgment thereon is signed by the
trial judge in accordance with Code of Civil Procedure Article 1911.
(2) Legal interest accruing subsequent to the signing of the judgment shall be
at the rate fixed by R.S. 9:3500. Judicial interest accruing subsequent to the
signing of the judgment shall be at the rate fixed by R.S. 13:4202.
* * *
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.